Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 5 School District Organization [Repealed]

§§ 21-5-101 through 21-5-137.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1969, ch. 111, §§ 105 through 135, and Laws 1977, ch. 181, § 1, related to the Wyoming School District Organization Law of 1969.